Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-131
Compensation; waiver by employee invalid.

No agreement by an employee to waive his or her rights to compensation under the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act shall be valid.

Laws 1913, c. 198, § 31, p. 593;

R.S.1913, § 3672;

C.S.1922, § 3054;

C.S.1929, § 48-131;

R.S.1943, § 48-131;

Laws 1986, LB 811, § 50.

On payments of compensation without agreement of settlement, statutory limitations did not take effect until one year from last payment. Ashton v. Blue River Power Co., 117 Neb. 661, 222 N.W. 42 (1928).